Utah statutes.
78B-19-107.   Emergency orders.
During a collaborative law process, a court may issue emergency orders,
including protective orders in accordance with Title 78B, Chapter 7, Part 1,
Cohabitant Abuse Act, or Part 2, Child Protective Orders, to protect the
health, safety, welfare, or interest of a party or member of a party's
household.
